Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 6. Breach, Repudiation, and Excuse.

Sec. 45.02.601.
Buyer’s rights on improper delivery.

Subject to the provisions on breach in installment contracts (AS

45.02.612

) and unless otherwise agreed under the sections on contractual limitations of remedy (AS

45.02.718

and

45.02.719

), if the goods or the tender of delivery fail in any respect to conform to the contract, the buyer may

reject the whole;

accept the whole; or

accept any commercial unit and reject the rest.

History.

(§ 2.601 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.602.
Manner and effect of rightful rejection.

Rejection of goods must be within a reasonable time after their delivery or tender. It is ineffective unless the buyer seasonably notifies the seller.

Subject to the provisions of AS

45.02.603

and

45.02.604

on rejected goods,

after rejection, an exercise of ownership by the buyer with respect to a commercial unit is wrongful as against the seller; and

if the buyer has, before rejection, taken physical possession of goods in which the buyer does not have a security interest under AS

45.02.711(c)

, the buyer is under a duty after rejection to hold them with reasonable care at the seller’s disposition for a time sufficient to permit the seller to remove them; but

the buyer has no further obligations with regard to goods rightfully rejected.

The seller’s rights with respect to goods wrongfully rejected are governed by the provisions on seller’s remedies in general (AS

45.02.703

).

History.

(§ 2.602 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, §§ 456, 587 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.603.
Merchant buyer’s duties as to rightfully rejected goods.

Subject to a security interest in the buyer (AS

45.02.711(c)

), if the seller has no agent or place of business at the market of rejection, a merchant buyer is under a duty after rejection of goods in the buyer’s possession or control to follow reasonable instructions received from the seller with respect to the goods and, in the absence of the instructions, to make reasonable efforts to sell them for the seller’s account if they are perishable or threaten to decline in value speedily. Instructions are not reasonable if on demand indemnity for expenses is not forthcoming.

If the buyer sells goods under (a) of this section, the buyer is entitled to reimbursement from the seller, or out of the proceeds, for reasonable expenses of caring for and selling them, and if the expenses include no selling commission then to such commission as is usual in the trade or if there is none to a reasonable sum not exceeding 10 percent on the gross proceeds.

In complying with this section, the buyer is held only to good faith, and good faith conduct here is not acceptance, conversion, or the basis of an action for damages.

History.

(§ 2.603 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, §§ 598 to 600

67A Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 1085 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.604.
Buyer’s options as to salvage of rightfully rejected goods.

Subject to the provisions of AS

45.02.603

on perishables, if the seller gives no instructions within a reasonable time after notification of rejection, the buyer may store the rejected goods for the seller’s account or reship them to the seller or resell them for the seller’s account with reimbursement as provided in AS

45.02.603

.
This action is not acceptance or conversion.

History.

(§ 2.604 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.605.
Waiver of buyer’s objections by failure to particularize.

The buyer’s failure to state in connection with rejection a particular defect that is ascertainable by reasonable inspection precludes the buyer from relying on the unstated defect to justify rejection or to establish breach

if the seller could have cured it if stated seasonably; or

between merchants if the seller has, after rejection, made a request in writing for a full and final written statement of all defects on which the buyer proposes to rely.

Payment against documents made without reservation of rights precludes recovery of the payment for defects apparent in the documents.

History.

(§ 2.605 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 23 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), substituted “in” for “on the face of” following “for defects apparent”.

Sec. 45.02.606.
What constitutes acceptance of goods.

Acceptance of goods occurs when the buyer,

after a reasonable opportunity to inspect the goods, signifies to the seller that the goods are conforming or that the buyer will take or retain them in spite of their nonconformity;

fails to make an effective rejection (AS

45.02.602

), but this acceptance does not occur until the buyer has had a reasonable opportunity to inspect them; or

does an act inconsistent with the seller’s ownership; but if this act is wrongful as against the seller it is an acceptance only if ratified by the seller.

Acceptance of a part of a commercial unit is acceptance of that entire unit.

History.

(§ 2.606 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.607.
Effect of acceptance; notice of breach; burden of establishing breach after acceptance; notice of claim or litigation to person answerable over.

The buyer must pay at the contract rate for any goods accepted.

Acceptance of goods by the buyer precludes rejection of the goods accepted and, if made with knowledge of a nonconformity, cannot be revoked because of it unless the acceptance was on the reasonable assumption that the nonconformity would be seasonably cured, but acceptance does not of itself impair any other remedy provided by this chapter for nonconformity.

If a tender has been accepted,

the buyer must, within a reasonable time after the buyer discovers or should have discovered a breach, notify the seller of the breach or be barred from any remedy; and

if the claim is one for infringement or the like (AS

45.02.312(c)

) and the buyer is sued as a result of such a breach, the buyer must so notify the seller within a reasonable time after the buyer receives notice of the litigation or be barred from any remedy over for liability established by the litigation.

The burden is on the buyer to establish a breach with respect to the goods accepted.

If the buyer is sued for breach of a warranty or other obligation for which the buyer’s seller is answerable over,

the buyer may give the seller written notice of the litigation; if the notice states that the seller may come in and defend and that if the seller does not do so the seller will be bound in an action against the seller by the seller’s buyer by a determination of fact common to the two litigations, then, unless the seller, after seasonable receipt of the notice, does come in and defend, the seller is so bound;

if the claim is one for infringement or the like (AS

45.02.312(c)

), the original seller may demand in writing that the seller’s buyer turn over to the seller control of the litigation including settlement or else be barred from any remedy over, and if the seller also agrees to bear all expense and to satisfy an adverse judgment, then unless the buyer after seasonable receipt of the demand does turn over control the buyer is so barred.

The provisions of (c) — (e) of this section apply to an obligation of a buyer to hold the seller harmless against infringement or the like (AS

45.02.312(c)

).

History.

(§ 2.607 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.608.
Revocation of acceptance in whole or in part.

The buyer may revoke acceptance of a lot or commercial unit whose nonconformity substantially impairs its value to the buyer if the buyer has accepted it

on the reasonable assumption that its nonconformity would be cured and it has not been seasonably cured; or

without discovery of the nonconformity if the buyer’s acceptance was reasonably induced either by the difficulty of discovery before acceptance or by the seller’s assurances.

Revocation of acceptance must occur within a reasonable time after the buyer discovers or should have discovered the ground for it and before a substantial change in condition of the goods that is not caused by their own defects. It is not effective until the buyer notifies the seller of it.

A buyer who so revokes has the same rights and duties with regard to the goods involved as if the buyer had rejected them.

History.

(§ 2.608 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.609.
Right to adequate assurance of performance.

A contract for sale imposes an obligation on each party that the other’s expectation of receiving due performance will not be impaired. If reasonable grounds for insecurity arise with respect to the performance of either party, the other may in writing demand adequate assurance of due performance and, until the party receives this assurance, may, if commercially reasonable, suspend any performance for which the party has not already received the agreed return.

Between merchants the reasonableness of grounds for insecurity and the adequacy of an assurance offered shall be determined according to commercial standards.

Acceptance of an improper delivery or payment does not prejudice the aggrieved party’s right to demand adequate assurance of future performance.

After receipt of a justified demand, failure to provide, within a reasonable time not exceeding 30 days, such assurance of due performance as is adequate under the circumstances of the particular case is a repudiation of the contract.

History.

(§ 2.609 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.610.
Anticipatory repudiation.

When either party repudiates the contract with respect to a performance not yet due, the loss of which will substantially impair the value of the contract to the other, the aggrieved party may

for a commercially reasonable time await performance by the repudiating party; or

resort to any remedy for breach (AS

45.02.703

or

45.02.711

), even though the aggrieved party has notified the repudiating party that the former would await the latter’s performance and has urged retraction; and

in either case suspend the aggrieved party’s own performance or proceed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter on the seller’s right to identify goods to the contract notwithstanding breach or to salvage unfinished goods (AS

45.02.704

).

History.

(§ 2.610 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67A Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 801 et seq.

What constitutes anticipatory repudiation of sales contract under UCC § 2-610, 1 ALR4th 527.

Sec. 45.02.611.
Retraction of anticipatory repudiation.

Until the repudiating party’s next performance is due, that party can retract the repudiation unless the aggrieved party has, since the repudiation, cancelled or materially changed the aggrieved party’s position or otherwise indicated that the aggrieved party considers the repudiation final.

Retraction may be by any method that clearly indicates to the aggrieved party that the repudiating party intends to perform, but must include any assurance justifiably demanded under the provisions of AS

45.02.609

.

Retraction reinstates the repudiating party’s right under the contract with due excuse and allowance to the aggrieved party for any delay occasioned by the repudiation.

History.

(§ 2.611 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.612.
“Installment contract”; breach.

An “installment contract” is one that requires or authorizes the delivery of goods in separate lots to be separately accepted, even though the contract contains a clause, “each delivery is a separate contract,” or its equivalent.

The buyer may reject an installment that is nonconforming if the nonconformity substantially impairs the value of that installment and cannot be cured or if the nonconformity is a defect in the required documents; but if the nonconformity does not fall within (c) of this section and the seller gives adequate assurance of its cure, the buyer must accept that installment.

If nonconformity or default with respect to one or more installments substantially impairs the value of the whole contract, there is a breach of the whole. But the aggrieved party reinstates the contract if the party accepts a nonconforming installment without seasonably notifying of cancellation or if the party brings an action with respect only to past installments or demands performance as to future installments.

History.

(§ 2.612 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 617 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.613.
Casualty to identified goods.

If the contract requires for its performance goods identified when the contract is made, and the goods suffer casualty without fault of either party before the risk of loss passes to the buyer, or in a proper case under a “no arrival, no sale” term (AS

45.02.324

), then (1) if the loss is total, the contract is avoided, and (2) if the loss is partial or the goods have so deteriorated as no longer to conform to the contract, the buyer may nevertheless demand inspection and at the buyer’s option either treat the contract as avoided or accept the goods with due allowance from the contract price for the deterioration or the deficiency in quantity but without further right against the seller.

History.

(§ 2.613 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

Casualty, construction and effect of UCC § 2-613 governing casualty to goods identified to a contract, without fault of buyer or seller, 51 ALR4th 537.

Sec. 45.02.614.
Substituted performance.

If without fault of either party the agreed berthing, loading, or unloading facilities fail or an agreed type of carrier becomes unavailable or the agreed manner of delivery otherwise becomes commercially impracticable but a commercially reasonable substitute is available, the substitute performance must be tendered and accepted.

If the agreed means or manner of payment fails because of domestic or foreign governmental regulation, the seller may withhold or stop delivery unless the buyer provides a means or manner of payment that is commercially a substantial equivalent. If delivery has already been taken, payment by the means or in the manner provided by the regulation discharges the buyer’s obligation unless the regulation is discriminatory, oppressive, or predatory.

History.

(§ 2.614 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 531 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.615.
Excuse by failure of presupposed conditions.

Except so far as a seller may have assumed a greater obligation and subject to the preceding section on substituted performance,

delay in delivery or nondelivery in whole or in part by a seller who complies with (2) and (3) of this section is not a breach of the seller’s duty under a contract for sale if performance as agreed has been made impracticable by the occurrence of a contingency, the nonoccurrence of which was a basic assumption on which the contract was made or by compliance in good faith with an applicable foreign or domestic governmental regulation or order whether or not it later proves to be invalid;

if the causes mentioned in (1) of this section affect only a part of the seller’s capacity to perform, the seller must allocate production and deliveries among the seller’s customers, but may at the seller’s option include regular customers not then under contract as well as the seller’s own requirements for further manufacture; the seller may so allocate in a manner that is fair and reasonable;

the seller must notify the buyer seasonably that there will be delay or nondelivery and, when allocation is required under (2) of this section, of the estimated quota thus made available for the buyer.

History.

(§ 2.615 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 543 et seq.

Labor disputes as excusing, under UCC § 2-615, failure to deliver goods sold, 70 ALR3d 1266.

Impracticability of performance of sales contract as defense under UCC § 2-615, 93 ALR3d 584.

Sec. 45.02.616.
Procedure on notice claiming excuse.

If the buyer receives notification of a material or indefinite delay or an allocation justified under AS

45.02.615

, the buyer may by written notification to the seller as to any delivery concerned and if the prospective deficiency substantially impairs the value of the whole contract under the provisions relating to breach of installment contracts, AS

45.02.612

, then also as to the whole,

terminate and thereby discharge any unexecuted portion of the contract; or

modify the contract by agreeing to take the buyer’s available quota in substitution.

If, after receipt of the notification from the seller, the buyer fails so to modify the contract within a reasonable time not exceeding 30 days, the contract lapses with respect to deliveries affected.

This section may not be negated by agreement except insofar as the seller has assumed a greater obligation under AS

45.02.615

.

History.

(§ 2.616 ch 114 SLA 1962)